Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202683-901
Sections; purpose.

The purpose of sections 68-621, 72-249, 72-1302 to 72-1304, 81-101, 81-102, 81-1021, 83-101.08, 83-107.01, 83-108, 83-112, 83-135, 83-139, 83-140, 83-144, 83-145, 83-147 to 83-150, 83-153 to 83-156, 83-170 to 83-173, 83-186, 83-188, 83-443, and 83-901 to 83-916 is to establish an agency of state government for the custody, study, care, discipline, training, and treatment of persons in the correctional and detention institutions and for the study, training, and treatment of persons under the supervision of other correctional services of the state so that they may be prepared for lawful community living. Correctional services shall be so diversified in program and personnel as to facilitate individualization of treatment.

Laws 1973, LB 563, § 53;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 958;

Laws 1997, LB 307, § 228;

Laws 1998, LB 1073, § 168;

Laws 2007, LB256, § 14;

Laws 2020, LB1148, § 15;

Laws 2024, LB631, § 46;

Laws 2026, LB1236, § 18.
January 1, 2027
Department of Correctional Services, created, see sections 81-101 and 83-171.

Director of Correctional Services, appointment, salary, qualifications, see sections 81-102 and 83-172.